Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Chapter 5 Leasing Generally

Law reviews. —

For comment, “State Participation in Federal Policy Making for the Yellowstone Ecosystem: A Meaningful Solution or Business as Usual?” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 397 (1986).

For article, “Fifty Years of Rhetoric on the Range: Reframing the Debate on Public Land Management,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 339 (1997).

For article, “The Bureau of Land Management: A Half-Century of Challenges and Change,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 345 (1997).

For article, “The Rise and Fall of Grazing Reform,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 413 (1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

63C Am. Jur. 2d Public Lands § 89, 93 to 95; 72 Am. Jur. 2d States, Territories and Dependencies §§ 64 to 68.

73B C.J.S. Public Lands § 197.

§ 36-5-101.
Qualifications of lessees; lease terms; rental.

No person shall be qualified to lease state lands unless that person has reached the age of majority, and is a citizen of the United States, or has declared an intention to become a citizen of the United States. No person or legal entity shall be qualified to lease state lands unless he or it has complied with the laws of this state and is authorized to transact business in this state.

The rental of any lease awarded shall be based on an economic analysis and shall reflect at least the fair market value for the same or similar use of the land based upon a formula adopted by the board using the following criteria:

Readily available data averaged over an adequate number of years to remove any radical fluctuations;

Factors which reasonably reflect the true market value of state leases;

Parameters within which the board can be responsive to changing resource conditions, market demand and industry viability;

Factors which reasonably reflect the contributions made by the lessee.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 108, § 9; R.S. 1931, § 91-109; Laws 1935, ch. 106, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 24-109; W.S. 1957, § 36-62; Laws 1973, ch. 213, § 2; 1997, ch. 200, § 1.

Rental offered must be considered by board. —

Under statute, amount of rental offered must be considered by board in leasing state lands, notwithstanding that offer exceeds reasonable rental value fixed by board. Sullivan Co. v. Meer, 58 Wyo. 90, 125 P.2d 168,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1942).

Section permits lease and rights thereunder to pass to estate or representative

of deceased lessee and, right of preference being property right, such representative becomes applicant entitled to preference in applying for renewal. Hogan v. Greenfield, 58 Wyo. 13, 122 P.2d 850,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1942).

State school land leases and preferential rights thereunder pass to estate or representative of deceased and not to his heirs. Hogan v. Greenfield, 58 Wyo. 13, 122 P.2d 850,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1942).

Discretion of board in leasing to qualified corporation. —

Where board, in exercising its discretionary power, leased state lands to qualified corporation holding expired lease, and neither exercised its discretion illegally, nor gravely abused it and no fraud is proved, board action must be affirmed. Banzhaf v. Swan Co., 60 Wyo. 201, 148 P.2d 225,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1944).

Right to compulsory process. —

Court did not violate defendant's right to present a defense and to compulsory process because defendant identified the expert less than three days before trial, and if the expert's testimony was to be adequately “tested,” so as to facilitate the presentation of reliable evidence, the State must have been provided an opportunity to investigate the expert. Given such short notice by defendant, however, the State could not have assembled an adequate response to the expert's testimony prior to trial.
Gruwell v. State, 2011 WY 67, 254 P.3d 223,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 2011).

Renewalapplicant required to match higher bid. —

Pursuant to this section, former Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 36-5-105(c), and Wyo. Bd. Land Comm'rs Rules, ch. 4, § 6, a party seeking to exercise its preferential right to renew a state lease was properly required to match a competing applicant's higher bid. Fair market value was established by the higher bid, without any maximum limit.
Office of State Lands & Invs. v. Mule Shoe Ranch, Inc., 2011 WY 68, 252 P.3d 951,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 2011).

Applied

in

Frolander v. Ilsley, 72 Wyo. 342, 264 P.2d 790,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(1953).

Quoted

in

Stauffer v. Johnson, 71 Wyo. 386, 259 P.2d 753,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(1953).

Cited

in

Riedel v. Anderson, 2003 WY 70, 70 P.3d 223,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 2003).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming's Last Great Range War: The Modern Debate Over the State's Public School Lands,” see XXXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 75 (1999).

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §§ 63.01,
63.03 (Matthew Bender).

§ 36-5-102.
Maximum term of agricultural or grazing lease.

No lease for agricultural or grazing purposes shall be issued for a term of more than ten (10) years.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 108, § 10; R.S. 1931, § 91-110; Laws 1937, ch. 49, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 24-110; W.S. 1957, § 36-63.

Entitled to renewal at same rental. —

Where lessee is entitled to renewal on ground of reclamation of land he is entitled to such renewal at same rental as that stipulated in original lease under which reclamation occurred. State ex rel. Harrison v. State Bd. of Land Comm'rs, 10 Wyo. 413, 69 P. 562,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1902).

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition § 63.01 (Matthew Bender).

§ 36-5-103.
Application for lease; cancellation of application.

Any person, firm, association or corporation desiring to lease state lands for agricultural and grazing purposes shall file with the director an application on the form approved by the board, which must be accompanied by the regular filing fee, and a certified check, bank draft, cashier’s check, post office or express money order, cash or personal check acceptable to the director for the full amount of the first year’s rental offered; and if there are improvements owned by another located upon said lands, the applicant must also transmit in the manner above provided, the estimated amount of the value of the improvements as listed in his application, and in the event the successful applicant fails, refuses or neglects to complete the lease awarded, or otherwise fails, refuses, or neglects to comply with the provisions of this act, or the rules and regulations of the board, after having been given thirty (30) days notice by registered mail, the application shall be cancelled and the sum remitted as rentals and twenty-five percent (25%) of the sum remitted for improvements shall be retained by the board as liquidated damages; and the sum paid as rental shall be paid by the director to the state treasurer and credited by him to the proper permanent land income fund account, and the sum paid for improvements shall be credited to the general fund.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 108, § 11; 1931, ch. 41, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 91-111; C.S. 1945, § 24-111; W.S. 1957, § 36-64; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1992, ch. 55, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to filing fees, see §

36-3-110

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 36-1-101(a)(viii).

Furnishing of untrue information in application. —

Although information furnished board in application for lease by other parties within one mile of tract applied for was untrue, board was not required to cancel lease in contest proceeding in absence of showing state had been damaged thereby or that contestant's interest had been injuriously affected. Bucknum v. Johnson, 21 Wyo. 26, 127 P. 904,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1912).

Mandamus to require issuance of lease precluded. —

Where mineral lease applicant had adequate remedy by appeal from contest proceeding before the board to determine priority of applications for mineral prospectors' leases under board rules, mandamus would not lie to require issuance of lease. State ex rel. Walls v. State Bd. of Land Comm'rs, 36 Wyo. 302, 254 P. 491,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1927).

Applied

in

Frolander v. Ilsley, 72 Wyo. 342, 264 P.2d 790,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(1953).

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition § 63.01 (Matthew Bender).

§ 36-5-104.
Time for filing renewal applications.

All applications to lease grazing and agricultural lands under outstanding leases must be filed in the office of state lands and investments not earlier than one hundred twenty (120) days prior to, and not later than thirty (30) days prior to the expiration date of the existing lease. Any conflicting application to lease grazing and agricultural lands under any existing lease shall be filed in the office of state lands and investments not earlier than one hundred twenty (120) days prior to, and not later than, ninety (90) days prior to the expiration date of the existing lease. Upon receipt of a conflicting lease application the office of state lands and investments shall notify the current lessee that a conflicting lease application has been received and shall provide the current lessee not less than thirty (30) days from receipt of notice to file a lease renewal application.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 108, § 12; R.S. 1931, § 91-112; C.S. 1945, § 24-112; W.S. 1957, § 36-65; Laws 1992, ch. 55, § 3; 1998, ch. 13, § 1; 2000, ch. 49, § 1.

Right to renew. —

Former statute entitling lessee of state lands to renewal of lease for five-year periods, aggregating 20 years, did not give lessee of school lands granted to state by Act of Admission vested right to renewal, since that would violate condition on which school lands were granted to state. State ex rel. Huckfeldt v. State Bd. of Sch. Land Comm'rs, 20 Wyo. 162, 122 P. 94,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1912).

Board's discretion in renewal of leases should not be interfered with by courts

except in cases of fraud or grave abuse resulting in manifest wrong or injustices. Baker v. Brown, 12 Wyo. 198, 74 P. 94,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1903).

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition § 63.01 (Matthew Bender).